District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-349

Powers of Mayor and District of Columbia Auditor; accountability of Auditor.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-32, § 10, 24 DCR 3725
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Mar. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-56, § 2(a), 44 DCR 6933

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-349.
1973 Ed., § 47-279.